Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 29 LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACT
§ 50-2909. Issuance of bonds — Bond provisions.

If the local governing body of an authorized municipality has enacted an ordinance adopting a revenue allocation financing provision as part of an urban renewal plan, the urban renewal agency established by such municipality is hereby authorized and empowered:

To apply the revenues allocated to it pursuant to section 50-2908, Idaho Code, for payment of the projected costs of any urban renewal project located in the revenue allocation area;

To borrow money, incur indebtedness and issue one (1) or more series of bonds to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, the urban renewal projects authorized pursuant to such plan within the limits established by paragraph (c) of this subsection; and

To pledge irrevocably to the payment of principal of and interest on such moneys borrowed, indebtedness incurred or bonds issued by the agency the revenues allocated to it pursuant to section 50-2908, Idaho Code.

The agency shall be obligated and bound to pay such borrowed moneys, indebtedness, and bonds as the same shall become due, but only to the extent that the moneys are available in a special fund or funds established under section 50-2908, Idaho Code; and the agency is authorized to maintain an adequate reserve therefor from any moneys deposited in such a special fund or funds.

Nothing in this chapter shall in any way impair any powers an urban renewal agency may have under subsection (a) of section 50-2012, Idaho Code.

When the revenue allocation area plan budget described in section 50-2903(5), Idaho Code, estimates that all financial obligations have been provided for, the principal of and interest on such moneys, indebtedness and bonds have been paid in full, or when deposits in the special fund or funds created under this chapter are sufficient to pay such principal and interest as they come due, and to fund reserves, if any, or any other obligations of the agency funded through revenue allocation proceeds shall be satisfied and the agency has determined no additional project costs need be funded through revenue allocation financing, the allocation of revenues under section 50-2908, Idaho Code, shall thereupon cease; any moneys in such fund or funds in excess of the amount necessary to pay such principal and interest shall be distributed to the affected taxing districts in which the revenue allocation area is located in the same manner and proportion as the most recent distribution to the affected taxing districts of the taxes on the taxable property located within the revenue allocation area; and the powers granted to the urban renewal agency under section 50-2909, Idaho Code, shall thereupon terminate.

All bonds issued under this section shall be issued in accordance with section 50-2012, Idaho Code, except that such bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund or funds established pursuant to section 50-2908, Idaho Code. On and after July 1, 2011, bonds may be issued for a maximum period of twenty (20) years.

§ 50-2910. Bonds not general obligation of agency or municipality.

Except to the extent of moneys deposited in a special fund or funds under this act and pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds or other obligations, the agency shall not be liable on any such bonds or other obligations. The bonds issued and other obligations incurred by any agency under this chapter shall not constitute a general obligation or debt of any municipality, the state or any of its political subdivisions. In no event shall such bonds or other obligations give rise to general obligation or liability of the agency, the municipality, the state, or any of its political subdivisions, or give rise to a charge against their general credit or taxing powers, or be payable out of any funds or properties other than the special fund or funds of the agency pledged therefor; and such bonds and other obligations shall so state on their face. Such bonds and other obligations shall not constitute an indebtedness or the pledging of faith and credit within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction.

§ 50-2911. Limitations on review.

No direct or collateral action attacking or otherwise questioning the validity of any urban renewal plan, project or modification thereto (including one containing a revenue allocation provision), or the adoption or approval of such plan, project or modification, or any of the findings or determinations of the agency or the local governing body in connection with such plan, project or modification, shall be brought prior to the effective date of the ordinance adopting or modifying the plan. No direct or collateral action attacking or otherwise questioning the validity of bonds issued pursuant to section 50-2909, Idaho Code, shall be brought prior to the effective date of the resolution or ordinance authorizing such bonds.

For a period of thirty (30) days after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution, any person in interest shall have the right to contest the legality of such ordinance, resolution or proceeding or any bonds which may be authorized thereby. No contest or proceeding to question the validity or legality of any ordinance, resolution or proceeding, or any bonds which may be authorized thereby, passed or adopted under the provisions of this chapter shall be brought in any court by any person for any cause whatsoever, after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the effective date of the ordinance, resolution or proceeding, and after such time the validity, legality and regularity of such ordinance, resolution or proceeding or any bonds authorized thereby shall be conclusively presumed. If the question of the validity of any adopted plan or bonds issued pursuant to this chapter is not raised within thirty (30) days from the effective date of the ordinance, resolution or proceeding issuing said bonds and fixing their terms, the authority of the plan, the authority adopting the plan, or the authority to issue the bonds, and the legality thereof, the same shall be conclusively presumed and no court shall thereafter have authority to inquire into such matters.

§ 50-2912. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this act.

§ 50-2913. Urban renewal agency plans — Reporting information required — Penalties for failure to report.

In addition to the provisions applicable to urban renewal agencies in chapters 20 and 29, title 50, Idaho Code, the provisions of this section shall also apply to urban renewal agencies. For purposes of this section, “urban renewal agency” shall have the same meaning as provided in chapters 20 and 29, title 50, Idaho Code.

There is hereby established a central registry with the state tax commission. The registry shall serve as the unified location for the reporting of and access to administrative and financial information of urban renewal plans in this state. To establish a complete list of all urban renewal plans of urban renewal agencies operating in Idaho, on the effective date of this act and so that the registry established will be comprehensive, every urban renewal agency shall register with the state registry. For calendar year 2017, the submission of information required by subsection (2) of this section shall occur prior to March 1, 2017, and shall be in the form and format required by the state tax commission. In addition to the information required by this section for the March 1, 2017, filing deadline, the entity shall report the date of its last adoption or amendment or modification of an urban renewal plan. The registry listing will be available on the state tax commission website by July 1, 2017.
(1)(a) There is hereby established a central registry with the state tax commission. The registry shall serve as the unified location for the reporting of and access to administrative and financial information of urban renewal plans in this state. To establish a complete list of all urban renewal plans of urban renewal agencies operating in Idaho, on the effective date of this act and so that the registry established will be comprehensive, every urban renewal agency shall register with the state registry. For calendar year 2017, the submission of information required by subsection (2) of this section shall occur prior to March 1, 2017, and shall be in the form and format required by the state tax commission. In addition to the information required by this section for the March 1, 2017, filing deadline, the entity shall report the date of its last adoption or amendment or modification of an urban renewal plan. The registry listing will be available on the state tax commission website by July 1, 2017.

The state tax commission shall notify each urban renewal agency of the requirements of this section.

After March 1, and on or before December 1 of each year, the county clerk of each county shall submit a list to the state tax commission of all urban renewal agencies within the county.

On or before December 1 of each year, every urban renewal agency shall submit to the central registry the following information each urban renewal plan adopted or modified pursuant to sections 50-2008 and 50-2905, Idaho Code, and any modifications or amendments to those plans.

Within five (5) days of submitting to the central registry the information required by this section, the urban renewal agency shall notify the agency’s appointing authority, if the entity has an appointing authority, that it has submitted such information.

If any information provided by an entity as required by this section changes during the year, the entity shall update its information on the registry within thirty (30) days of any such change.

Notification and penalties.

If an urban renewal agency fails to submit information required by this section or submits noncompliant information required by this section, the state tax commission shall notify the entity immediately after the due date of the information that either the information was not submitted in a timely manner or the information submitted was noncompliant. The urban renewal agency shall then have thirty (30) days from the date of notice to submit the information or notify the state tax commission that it will comply by a time certain.

No later than September 1 of any year, the state tax commission shall notify the appropriate board of county commissioners and city council of the entity’s failure to comply with the provisions of this section. Upon receipt of such notification, the board of county commissioners shall place a public notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county indicating that the entity is noncompliant with the legal reporting requirements of this section. The county commissioners shall assess to the entity the cost of the public notice. Such costs may be deducted from any distributions of tax increment financing of the urban renewal agency. For any noncomplying urban renewal agency, the state tax commission shall notify the board of county commissioners and city council of the compliance status of such entity by September 1 of each year until the entity is in compliance.

An urban renewal agency that fails to comply with this section shall have any property tax revenue that exceeds the amount received in the immediate prior tax year distributed to the taxing districts located in or overlapping any revenue allocation area within that urban renewal district. Said distribution shall be based on each taxing district’s proportionate share of the increment value in the current tax year multiplied by the taxing district’s current levy rate, reduced proportionately to match the excess to be so apportioned. Any money so received by any taxing district shall be treated as property tax revenue for the purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code.

In addition to any other penalty provided in this section, in any failure to comply with this section, the state tax commission shall withhold the annual distribution of sales tax distribution pursuant to section 63-3638(13), Idaho Code, for any noncomplying urban renewal agency. The state tax commission shall withhold and retain such money in a reserve account until an urban renewal agency has complied with the provisions of this section, at which point the state tax commission shall pay any money owed to an urban renewal agency that was previously in violation of this section to the urban renewal agency.

For any urban renewal agency, upon notification to the board of county commissioners from the state tax commission of noncompliance by such entity, the board of county commissioners shall convene to determine appropriate compliance measures including, but not limited to, the following:

Require a meeting of the board of county commissioners and the urban renewal agency’s governing body wherein the board of county commissioners shall require compliance of this section by the entity; and

Assess a noncompliance fee on the noncomplying urban renewal agency. Such fee shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). Such fees and costs may be deducted from any distributions of the tax increment financing. Any fee collected shall be deposited into the county’s current expense fund.

The provisions of this section shall have no impact or effect upon reporting requirements for local governing entities relating to the state tax commission. The state tax commission may allow compliance with this section by the posting of links to an urban renewal agency’s website for the posting of plans.